Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 3. Management of the Common Interest Community
38-33.3-313.
Insurance.

Commencing not later than the time of the first conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available:

Property insurance on the common elements and, in a planned community, also on property that must become common elements, for broad form covered causes of loss; except that the total amount of insurance must be not less than the full insurable replacement cost of the insured property less applicable deductibles at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations, and other items normally excluded from property policies; and

Commercial general liability insurance against claims and liabilities arising in connection with the ownership, existence, use, or management of the common elements, and, in cooperatives, also of all units, in an amount, if any, specified by the common interest community instruments or otherwise deemed sufficient in the judgment of the executive board but not less than any amount specified in the association documents, insuring the executive board, the unit owners’ association, the management agent, and their respective employees, agents, and all persons acting as agents. The declarant shall be included as an additional insured in such declarant’s capacity as a unit owner and board member. The unit owners shall be included as additional insureds but only for claims and liabilities arising in connection with the ownership, existence, use, or management of the common elements and, in cooperatives, also of all units. The insurance shall cover claims of one or more insured parties against other insured parties.

In the case of a building that is part of a cooperative or that contains units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, the insurance maintained under paragraph

of subsection (1) of this section must include the units but not the finished interior surfaces of the walls, floors, and ceilings of the units. The insurance need not include improvements and betterments installed by unit owners, but if they are covered, any increased charge shall be assessed by the association to those owners.

If the insurance described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section is not reasonably available, or if any policy of such insurance is canceled or not renewed without a replacement policy therefore having been obtained, the association promptly shall cause notice of that fact to be hand delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to all unit owners. The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association in any event may carry any other insurance it considers appropriate, including insurance on units it is not obligated to insure, to protect the association or the unit owners.

Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section must provide that:

Each unit owner is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising out of such unit owner’s interest in the common elements or membership in the association;

The insurer waives its rights to subrogation under the policy against any unit owner or member of his household;

No act or omission by any unit owner, unless acting within the scope of such unit owner’s authority on behalf of the association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the policy; and

If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a unit owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association’s policy provides primary insurance.

Any loss covered by the property insurance policy described in paragraph

of subsection (1) and subsection (2) of this section must be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss shall be payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to any holder of a security interest. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for the association unit owners and lienholders as their interests may appear. Subject to the provisions of subsection (9) of this section, the proceeds must be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property, and the association, unit owners, and lienholders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored or the common interest community is terminated.

The association may adopt and establish written nondiscriminatory policies and procedures relating to the submittal of claims, responsibility for deductibles, and any other matters of claims adjustment. To the extent the association settles claims for damages to real property, it shall have the authority to assess negligent unit owners causing such loss or benefiting from such repair or restoration all deductibles paid by the association. In the event that more than one unit is damaged by a loss, the association in its reasonable discretion may assess each unit owner a pro rata share of any deductible paid by the association.

An insurance policy issued to the association does not obviate the need for unit owners to obtain insurance for their own benefit.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy for the insurance described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon request, to any unit owner or holder of a security interest. Unless otherwise provided by statute, the insurer issuing the policy may not cancel or refuse to renew it until thirty days after notice of the proposed cancellation or nonrenewal has been mailed to the association, and each unit owner and holder of a security interest to whom a certificate or memorandum of insurance has been issued, at their respective last-known addresses.

Any portion of the common interest community for which insurance is required under this section which is damaged or destroyed must be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless:

The common interest community is terminated, in which case section 38-33.3-218 applies;

Repair or replacement would be illegal under any state or local statute or ordinance governing health or safety;

Sixty-seven percent of the unit owners, including every owner of a unit or assigned limited common element that will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild; or

Prior to the conveyance of any unit to a person other than the declarant, the holder of a deed of trust or mortgage on the damaged portion of the common interest community rightfully demands all or a substantial part of the insurance proceeds.

The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a common expense. If the entire common interest community is not repaired or replaced, the insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements must be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the common interest community, and, except to the extent that other persons will be distributees, the insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited common elements that are not rebuilt must be distributed to the owners of those units and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lienholders, as their interests may appear, and the remainder of the proceeds must be distributed to all the unit owners or lienholders, as their interests may appear, as follows:

In a condominium, in proportion to the common element interests of all the units; and

In a cooperative or planned community, in proportion to the common expense liabilities of all the units; except that, in a fixed or limited equity cooperative, the unit owner may not receive more of the proceeds than would satisfy the unit owner’s entitlements under the declaration if the unit owner leaves the cooperative. In such a cooperative, the proceeds that remain after satisfying the unit owner’s obligations continue to be held in trust by the association for the benefit of the cooperative. If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit’s allocated interests are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under section 38-33.3-107, and the association promptly shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations.

If any unit owner or employee of an association with thirty or more units controls or disburses funds of the common interest community, the association must obtain and maintain, to the extent reasonably available, fidelity insurance. Coverage shall not be less in aggregate than two months’ current assessments plus reserves, as calculated from the current budget of the association.

Any person employed as an independent contractor by an association with thirty or more units for the purposes of managing a common interest community must obtain and maintain fidelity insurance in an amount not less than the amount specified in subsection (10) of this section, unless the association names such person as an insured employee in a contract of fidelity insurance, pursuant to subsection (10) of this section.

The association may carry fidelity insurance in amounts greater than required in subsection (10) of this section and may require any independent contractor employed for the purposes of managing a common interest community to carry more fidelity insurance coverage than required in subsection (10) of this section.

Premiums for insurance that the association acquires and other expenses connected with acquiring such insurance are common expenses.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1748, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 98:

(9)(a)(III) amended, p. 485, § 18, effective July 1.

38-33.3-314.
Surplus funds.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, any surplus funds of the association remaining after payment of or provision for common expenses and any prepayment of or provision for reserves shall be paid to the unit owners in proportion to their common expense liabilities or credited to them to reduce their future common expense assessments.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1752, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 652, § 19, effective April 30.

38-33.3-315.
Assessments for common expenses.

Until the association makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all common expenses. After any assessment has been made by the association, assessments shall be made no less frequently than annually and shall be based on a budget adopted no less frequently than annually by the association.

Except for assessments under subsections (3) and (4) of this section and section 38-33.3-207 (4)(a)(IV), all common expenses shall be assessed against all the units in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration pursuant to section 38-33.3-207 (1) and (2). Any past-due common expense assessment or installment thereof shall bear interest at the rate established by the association not exceeding twenty-one percent per year.

To the extent required by the declaration:

Any common expense associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element shall be assessed against the units to which that limited common element is assigned, equally, or in any other proportion the declaration provides;

Any common expense or portion thereof benefiting fewer than all of the units shall be assessed exclusively against the units benefited; and

The costs of insurance shall be assessed in proportion to risk, and the costs of utilities shall be assessed in proportion to usage.

If any common expense is caused by the misconduct of any unit owner, the association may assess that expense exclusively against such owner’s unit.

If common expense liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment thereof not yet due shall be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

Each unit owner is liable for assessments made against such owner’s unit during the period of ownership of such unit. No unit owner may be exempt from liability for payment of the assessments by waiver of the use or enjoyment of any of the common elements or by abandonment of the unit against which the assessments are made.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in the declaration or bylaws, the association may enter into an escrow agreement with the holder of a unit owner’s mortgage so that assessments may be combined with the unit owner’s mortgage payments and paid at the same time and in the same manner; except that any such escrow agreement shall comply with any applicable rules of the federal housing administration, department of housing and urban development, veterans’ administration, or other government agency.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1753, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(6) amended, p. 653, § 20, effective April 30.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2849, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(7) added, p. 1387, § 17, effective January 1, 2006.

38-33.3-316.
Lien for assessments.

The association, if such association is incorporated or organized as a limited liability company, has a statutory lien on a unit for any assessment levied against that unit or fines imposed against its unit owner. Unless the declaration otherwise provides, fees, charges, late charges, attorney fees, fines, and interest charged pursuant to section 38-33.3-302 (1)(j), (1)(k), and (1)(l), section 38-33.3-313 (6), and section 38-33.3-315 (2) are enforceable as assessments under this article. The amount of the lien shall include all those items set forth in this section from the time such items become due. If an assessment is payable in installments, each installment is a lien from the time it becomes due, including the due date set by any valid association’s acceleration of installment obligations.

A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a unit except:

L

iens and encumbrances recorded before the recordation of the declaration and, in a cooperative, liens and encumbrances which the association creates, assumes, or takes subject to;

A security interest on the unit which has priority over all other security interests on the unit and which was recorded before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent, or, in a cooperative, a security interest encumbering only the unit owner’s interest which has priority over all other security interests on the unit and which was perfected before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent; and

L

iens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the unit or cooperative.

Subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection (2), a lien under this section is also prior to the security interests described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the extent of:

An amount equal to the common expense assessments based on a periodic budget adopted by the association under section

38-33.3-315 (1)

which would have become due, in the absence of any acceleration, during the six months immediately preceding institution by either the association or any party holding a lien senior to any part of the association lien created under this section of an action or a nonjudicial foreclosure either to enforce or to extinguish the lien.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 653, § 21, effective April 30, 1993.)

This subsection (2) does not affect the priority of mechanics’ or materialmen’s liens or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the association. A lien under this section is not subject to the provisions of part 2 of article 41 of this title or to the provisions of section

15-11-202

, C.R.S.

The association shall have the statutory lien described in subsection (1) of this section for any assessment levied or fine imposed after June 30, 1992. Such lien shall have the priority described in this subsection (2) if the other lien or encumbrance is created after June 30, 1992.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same property, those liens have equal priority.

Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the lien. No further recordation of any claim of lien for assessments is required.

A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within six years after the full amount of assessments become due.

This section does not prohibit actions or suits to recover sums for which subsection (1) of this section creates a lien or to prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

The association shall be entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the association in a judgment or decree in any action or suit brought by the association under this section.

The association shall furnish to a unit owner or such unit owner’s designee or to a holder of a security interest or its designee upon written request, delivered personally or by certified mail, first-class postage prepaid, return receipt, to the association’s registered agent, a written statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments currently levied against such owner’s unit. The statement shall be furnished within fourteen calendar days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the executive board, and every unit owner. If no statement is furnished to the unit owner or holder of a security interest or his or her designee, delivered personally or by certified mail, first-class postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to the inquiring party, then the association shall have no right to assert a lien upon the unit for unpaid assessments which were due as of the date of the request.

In any action by an association to collect assessments or to foreclose a lien for unpaid assessments, the court may appoint a receiver of the unit owner to collect all sums alleged to be due from the unit owner prior to or during the pending of the action. The court may order the receiver to pay any sums held by the receiver to the association during the pending of the action to the extent of the association’s common expense assessments.

In a cooperative, upon nonpayment of an assessment on a unit, the unit owner may be evicted in the same manner as provided by law in the case of an unlawful holdover by a commercial tenant, and the lien may be foreclosed as provided by this section.

The association’s lien may be foreclosed by any of the following means:

In a condominium or planned community, the association’s lien may be foreclosed in like manner as a mortgage on real estate; except that the association or a holder or assignee of the association’s lien, whether the holder or assignee of the association’s lien is an entity or a natural person, may only foreclose on the lien if:

The balance of the assessments and charges secured by its lien, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, equals or exceeds six months of common expense assessments based on a periodic budget adopted by the association; and

The executive board has formally resolved, by a recorded vote, to authorize the filing of a legal action against the specific unit on an individual basis. The board may not delegate its duty to act under this subparagraph (II) to any attorney, insurer, manager, or other person, and any legal action filed without evidence of the recorded vote authorizing the action must be dismissed. No attorney fees, court costs, or other charges incurred by the association or a holder or assignee of the association’s lien in connection with an action that is dismissed for this reason may be assessed against the unit owner.

In a cooperative whose unit owners’ interests in the units are real estate as determined in accordance with the provisions of section 38-33.3-105, the association’s lien must be foreclosed in like manner as a mortgage on real estate; except that the association or a holder or assignee of the association’s lien, whether the holder or assignee of the association’s lien is an entity or a natural person, may only foreclose on the lien if:

The balance of the assessments and charges secured by its lien, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, equals or exceeds six months of common expense assessments based on a periodic budget adopted by the association; and

The executive board has formally resolved, by a recorded vote, to authorize the filing of a legal action against the specific unit on an individual basis. The board may not delegate its duty to act under this subparagraph (II) to any attorney, insurer, manager, or other person, and any legal action filed without evidence of the recorded vote authorizing the action must be dismissed. No attorney fees, court costs, or other charges incurred by the association or a holder or assignee of the association’s lien in connection with an action that is dismissed for this reason may be assessed against the unit owner.

In a cooperative whose unit owners’ interests in the units are personal property, as determined in accordance with the provisions of section 38-33.3-105, the association’s lien must be foreclosed as a security interest under the “Uniform Commercial Code”, title 4, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1753, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(1), (2)(b), (4), and (8) amended and (2)(d) added, p. 653, § 21, effective April 30.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 485, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(11)(a) and (11)(b) amended,(HB 13-1276), ch. 351, p. 2036, § 2, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

(2)(c) amended,(HB 14-1322), ch. 296, p. 1241, § 16, effective August 6.

38-33.3-316.3.
Collections - limitations.

In collecting past-due assessments and other delinquent payments under this article, an association or a holder or assignee of the association’s debt, whether the holder or assignee of the association’s debt is an entity or a natural person, shall:

Adopt and comply with a collections policy that meets the requirements of section 38-33.3-209.5 (5); and

Make a good-faith effort to coordinate with the unit owner to set up a payment plan that meets the requirements of this section; except that:

This section does not apply if the unit owner does not occupy the unit and has acquired the property as a result of:

A default of a security interest encumbering the unit; or

Foreclosure of the association’s lien; and

The association or a holder or assignee of the association’s debt is not obligated to negotiate a payment plan with a unit owner who has previously entered into a payment plan under this section.

A payment plan negotiated between the association or a holder or assignee of the association’s debt, whether the holder or assignee of the association’s debt is an entity or a natural person, and the unit owner pursuant to this section must permit the unit owner to pay off the deficiency in equal installments over a period of at least six months. Nothing in this section prohibits an association or a holder or assignee of the association’s debt from pursuing legal action against a unit owner if the unit owner fails to comply with the terms of his or her payment plan. A unit owner’s failure to remit payment of an agreed-upon installment, or to remain current with regular assessments as they come due during the six-month period, constitutes a failure to comply with the terms of his or her payment plan.

For purposes of this section, “assessments” includes regular and special assessments and any associated fees, charges, late charges, attorney fees, fines, and interest charged pursuant to section 38-33.3-315 (2).

History.

Source:
L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1276), ch. 351, p. 2037, § 3, effective January 1, 2014.

38-33.3-316.5.
Time share estate - foreclosure - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Junior lienor” has the same meaning as set forth in section 38-38-100.3 (12), C.R.S.

“Obligor” means the person liable for the assessment levied against a time share estate pursuant to section 38-33.3-316 or the record owner of the time share estate.

“Time share estate” has the same meaning as set forth in section 38-33-110 (5).

A plaintiff may commence a single judicial foreclosure action pursuant to section 38-33.3-316 (11), joining as defendants multiple obligors with separate time share estates and the junior lienors thereto, if:

The judicial foreclosure action involves a single common interest community;

The declaration giving rise to the right of the association to collect assessments creates default and remedy obligations that are substantially the same for each obligor named as a defendant in the judicial foreclosure action;

The action is limited to a claim for judicial foreclosure brought pursuant to section 38-33.3-316 (11); and

The plaintiff does not allege, with respect to any obligor, that the association’s lien is prior to any security interest described in section 38-33.3-316 (2)(a)(II), even if such a claim could be made pursuant to section 38-33.3-316 (2)(b)(I).

In a judicial foreclosure action in which multiple obligors with separate time share estates and the junior lienors thereto have been joined as defendants in accordance with this section:

In addition to any other circumstances where severance is proper under the Colorado rules of civil procedure, the court may sever for separate trial any disputed claim or claims;

If service by publication of two or more defendants is permitted by law, the plaintiff may publish a single notice for all joined defendants for whom service by publication is permitted, so long as all information that would be required by law to be provided in the published notice as to each defendant individually is included in the combined published notice. Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall be interpreted to allow service by publication of any defendant if service by publication is not otherwise permitted by law with respect to that defendant.

The action shall be deemed a single action, suit, or proceeding for purposes of payment of filing fees, notwithstanding any action by the court pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), so long as the plaintiff complies with subsection (2) of this section.

Notwithstanding that multiple obligors with separate time share estates may be joined in a single judicial foreclosure action, unless otherwise ordered by the court, each time share estate foreclosed pursuant to this section shall be subject to a separate foreclosure sale, and any cure or redemption rights with respect to such time share estate shall remain separate.

The plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to this section is deemed to waive any claims against a defendant for a deficiency remaining after the foreclosure of the lien for assessment and for attorney fees related to the foreclosure action.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1522, § 1, effective August 5.

38-33.3-317.
Association records - rules - applicability.

In addition to any records specifically defined in the association’s declaration or bylaws or expressly required by section 38-33.3-209.4 (2), the association must maintain the following, all of which shall be deemed to be the sole records of the association for purposes of document retention and production to owners:

Detailed records of receipts and expenditures affecting the operation and administration of the association;

Records of claims for construction defects and amounts received pursuant to settlement of those claims;

Minutes of all meetings of its unit owners and executive board, a record of all actions taken by the unit owners or executive board without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by any committee of the executive board;

Written communications among, and the votes cast by, executive board members that are:

Directly related to an action taken by the board without a meeting pursuant to section 7-128-202, C.R.S.; or

Directly related to an action taken by the board without a meeting pursuant to the association’s bylaws;

The names of unit owners in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names of all unit owners and the physical mailing addresses at which the association communicates with them, showing the number of votes each unit owner is entitled to vote; except that this paragraph (e) does not apply to a unit, or the owner thereof, if the unit is a time-share unit, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7);

Its current declaration, covenants, bylaws, articles of incorporation, if it is a corporation, or the corresponding organizational documents if it is another form of entity, rules and regulations, responsible governance policies adopted pursuant to section 38-33.3-209.5, and other policies adopted by the executive board;

Financial statements as described in section 7-136-106, C.R.S., for the past three years and tax returns of the association for the past seven years, to the extent available;

A list of the names, electronic mail addresses, and physical mailing addresses of its current executive board members and officers;

A list of the current amounts of all unique and extraordinary fees, assessments, and expenses that are chargeable by the association in connection with the purchase or sale of a unit and are not paid for through assessments, including transfer fees, record change fees, and the charge for a status letter or statement of assessments due;

All documents included in the association’s annual disclosures made pursuant to section 38-33.3-209.4.

Its most recent annual report delivered to the secretary of state, if any;

Financial records sufficiently detailed to enable the association to comply with section 38-33.3-316 (8) concerning statements of unpaid assessments;

The association’s most recent reserve study, if any;

Current written contracts to which the association is a party and contracts for work performed for the association within the immediately preceding two years;

Records of executive board or committee actions to approve or deny any requests for design or architectural approval from unit owners;

Ballots, proxies, and other records related to voting by unit owners for one year after the election, action, or vote to which they relate;

Resolutions adopted by its board of directors relating to the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of members or any class or category of members; and

All written communications within the past three years to all unit owners generally as unit owners.

Subject to subsections (3), (3.5), and (4) of this section, all records maintained by the association must be available for examination and copying by a unit owner or the owner’s authorized agent. The association may require unit owners to submit a written request, describing with reasonable particularity the records sought, at least ten days prior to inspection or production of the documents and may limit examination and copying times to normal business hours or the next regularly scheduled executive board meeting if the meeting occurs within thirty days after the request. Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration, bylaws, articles, or rules and regulations of the association to the contrary, the association may not condition the production of records upon the statement of a proper purpose.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), a membership list or any part thereof may not be obtained or used by any person for any purpose unrelated to a unit owner’s interest as a unit owner without consent of the executive board.

Without limiting the generality of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), without the consent of the executive board, a membership list or any part thereof may not be:

Used to solicit money or property unless such money or property will be used solely to solicit the votes of the unit owners in an election to be held by the association;

Used for any commercial purpose; or

Sold to or purchased by any person.

Records maintained by an association may be withheld from inspection and copying to the extent that they are or concern:

Architectural drawings, plans, and designs, unless released upon the written consent of the legal owner of the drawings, plans, or designs;

Contracts, leases, bids, or records related to transactions to purchase or provide goods or services that are currently in or under negotiation;

Communications with legal counsel that are otherwise protected by the attorney-client privilege or the attorney work product doctrine;

Disclosure of information in violation of law;

Records of an executive session of an executive board;

Individual units other than those of the requesting owner; or

The names and physical mailing addresses of unit owners if the unit is a time-share unit, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

(3.5)

Records maintained by an association are not subject to inspection and copying, and they must be withheld, to the extent that they are or concern:

Personnel, salary, or medical records relating to specific individuals; or

Personal identification and account information of members and residents, including bank account information, telephone numbers, electronic mail addresses, driver’s license numbers, and social security numbers; except that, notwithstanding section 38-33.3-104, a member or resident may provide the association with prior written consent to the disclosure of, and the association may publish to other members and residents, the person’s telephone number, electronic mail address, or both. The written consent must be kept as a record of the association and remains valid until the person withdraws it by providing the association with a written notice of withdrawal of the consent. If a person withdraws his or her consent, the association is under no obligation to change, retrieve, or destroy any document or record published prior to the notice of withdrawal.

As used in this paragraph (b), written consent and notice of withdrawal of the consent may be given by means of a “record”, as defined in the “Uniform Electronic Transactions Act”, article 71.3 of title 24, C.R.S., if the parties so agree in accordance with section 24-71.3-105, C.R.S.

The association may impose a reasonable charge, which may be collected in advance and may cover the costs of labor and material, for copies of association records. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production and reproduction of the records, including the costs of copying, mailing, and any necessary special processing.

(4.5)

If the association fails to allow inspection or copying of records in accordance with this section within thirty calendar days after receipt of a written request submitted by certified mail, return receipt requested, and payment of any fees required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the association is liable for penalties in the amount of fifty dollars per day, commencing on the eleventh business day after the association received the written request, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars or the unit owner’s actual damages sustained as a result of the refusal, whichever is greater.

A right to copy records under this section includes the right to receive copies by photocopying or other means, including the receipt of copies through an electronic transmission if available, upon request by the unit owner.

An association is not obligated to compile or synthesize information.

Association records and the information contained within those records shall not be used for commercial purposes.

Subsections (1)(h.5), (1)(h.6), and (4.5) of this section, as added by House Bill 21-1229, enacted in 2021, and subsection (4) of this section, as amended by House Bill 21-1229, enacted in 2021, do not apply to an association that includes time share units, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1756, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1387, § 18, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(2), (3), (4), and (7) amended, p. 1224, § 13, effective May 26.

L. 2012:

Entire section R&RE,(HB 12-1237), ch. 232, p. 1016, § 1, effective January 1, 2013.

L. 2014:

(3.5) amended,(HB 14-1125), ch. 66, p. 290, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

(1)(h.5), (1)(h.6), (4.5) and (8) added and (4) amended,(HB 21-1229), ch. 409, p. 2709, § 4, effective September 7.

Editor’s note:

Section 5 of chapter 409 (HB 21-1229), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after September 7, 2021.

38-33.3-318.
Association as trustee.

With respect to a third person dealing with the association in the association’s capacity as a trustee, the existence of trust powers and their proper exercise by the association may be assumed without inquiry. A third person is not bound to inquire whether the association has the power to act as trustee or is properly exercising trust powers. A third person, without actual knowledge that the association is exceeding or improperly exercising its powers, is fully protected in dealing with the association as if it possessed and properly exercised the powers it purports to exercise. A third person is not bound to assure the proper application of trust assets paid or delivered to the association in its capacity as trustee.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1756, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-319.
Other applicable statutes.

To the extent that provisions of this article conflict with applicable provisions in the “Colorado Business Corporation Act”, articles 101 to 117 of title 7, C.R.S., the “Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act”, articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S., the “Uniform Partnership Law”, article 60 of title 7, C.R.S., the “Colorado Uniform Partnership Act (1997)”, article 64 of title 7, C.R.S., the “Colorado Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1981”, article 62 of title 7, C.R.S., article 1 of this title, article 55 of title 7, C.R.S., article 33.5 of this title, and section 39-1-103 (10), C.R.S., and any other laws of the state of Colorado which now exist or which are subsequently enacted, the provisions of this article shall control.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1756, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 865, § 41, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 919, § 18, effective January 1, 1998; entire section amended, p. 764, § 37, effective July 1, 1998.

Editor’s note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 97-1237 and Senate Bill 97-91 were harmonized.